Utah statutes.
53A-3-421.    Professional competence or performance -- Administrative
hearing by local school board -- Action on complaint.
(1) (a)  No civil action by or on behalf of a student relating to the
professional competence or performance of a licensed employee of a school
district, or to the discipline of students by a licensed employee, application
of in loco parentis, or a violation of ethical conduct by an employee of a
school district, may be brought in a court until at least 60 days after the
filing of a written complaint with the local board of education of the
district, or until findings have been issued by the local board after a
hearing on the complaint, whichever is sooner.
(b)  As used in Subsection (1)(a), "in loco parentis" means the power of
professional school personnel to exercise the rights, duties, and
responsibilities of a reasonable, responsible parent in dealing with students
in school-related matters.
(c)  A parent of a student has standing to file a civil action against an
employee who provides services to a school attended by the student.
(2)  Within 15 days of receiving a complaint under Subsection (1), a local
school board may elect to refer the complaint to the State Board of Education.
(3)  If a complaint is referred to the board, no civil action may be brought
in a court on matters relating to the complaint until the board has provided a
hearing and issued its findings or until 90 days after the filing of the
complaint with the local school board, whichever is sooner.
